Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-10,149
Nail technology school; license; application.

Any person seeking a license to operate a nail technology school shall submit a completed application at least thirty days before construction or remodeling of the building proposed for use is scheduled to begin. If no construction or remodeling is planned, the application shall be received at least thirty days before the proposed opening of the school.

Laws 1999, LB 68, § 69;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-3,220;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 411.